Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2218.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6610YH (2) 91 mb/jh H.F. 2218 Section 1. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0s. Be subject to and comply with the 3 requirements of section 279.89 relating to the installation of 4 video recording systems in special education classrooms in the 5 same manner as a school district. 6 Sec. 2. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 7 by adding the following new paragraph: 8 NEW PARAGRAPH . v. Be subject to and comply with the 9 requirements of section 279.89 relating to the installation of 10 video recording systems in special education classrooms in the 11 same manner as a school district. 12 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 279.89 Video recording systems in 13 special education classrooms. 14 A school district shall install a video recording system 15 in each special education classroom in each attendance 16 center. The video recording system, and any recording created 17 by the video recording system, must be consistent with the 18 requirements of any applicable state and federal privacy laws, 19 including the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy 20 Act, U.S.C. Â§1232g, and any regulations promulgated pursuant 21 to that Act. 22 Sec. 4. STATE MANDATE FUNDING SPECIFIED. In accordance 23 with section 25B.2, subsection 3, the state cost of requiring 24 compliance with any state mandate included in this Act shall 25 be paid by a school district from state school foundation aid 26 received by the school district under section 257.16. This 27 specification of the payment of the state cost shall be deemed 28 to meet all of the state funding-related requirements of 29 section 25B.2, subsection 3, and no additional state funding 30 shall be necessary for the full implementation of this Act 31 by and enforcement of this Act against all affected school 32 districts. 33